Utah statutes.
41-1a-1307.   Operation of motor vehicles, trailers, or semitrailers without
payment of fees -- Class C misdemeanor.
(1)  It is a class C misdemeanor for a person to operate a motor vehicle,
trailer, or semitrailer upon the  highways without having paid the title and
registration or transfer fees and taxes required by law.
(2)  In addition to any other penalty, the owner of a motor vehicle, trailer,
or semitrailer operated in violation of this section shall pay a penalty equal
to title and registration fees in addition to any other fee required under
this chapter.
(3)  A court may require proof of proper vehicle registration as part of any
sentence imposed under this section.
